Utah statutes.
59-2-402.   Proportional assessment of transitory personal property brought
from outside state -- Exemptions -- Reporting requirements -- Penalty for
failure to file report -- Claims for rebates and adjustments.
(1)  If any taxable transitory personal property, other than property exempted
under Subsection (2), is brought into the state at any time after the
assessment date, a proportional assessment shall be made in accordance with
rules adopted by the commission based upon the length of time that the
property is in the state, but in no event may the minimum assessment be less
than 25% of the full year's assessment.
(2)  The following property is exempt from proportional assessment under
Subsection (1) for the year in which the license fee or tax is paid:
(a)  property acquired during the calendar year;
(b)  registered motor vehicles with a gross laden weight of 27,000 pounds or
less;
(c)  vehicles that are registered and licensed in another state;
(d)  property subject to the provisions of Subsection 59-2-405(4);
(e)  state-assessed commercial vehicles; and
(f)  a motor home that is:
(i)  brought into the state for the sole purpose of selling the motor home to
a licensed dealer; and
(ii)  purchased for resale by a person licensed as a dealer under Section
41-3-201.
(3)  If any taxable transitory personal property is brought into the state at
any time during the year, the owner of the property, or the owner's agent,
shall immediately secure a personal property report form from the assessor,
complete it in all pertinent respects, sign it, and file it with the assessor
of the county in which the property is located.
(4)  If the owner of the taxable transitory personal property, or the owner's
agent, fails to secure, complete, and file a personal property report form
with the county assessor, the assessor shall estimate the value of the
property in accordance with Section 59-2-307.  Any failure on the part of the
owner or agent to report as required by this subsection subjects the property
owner to a penalty of 50% of the amount of tax finally determined to be due.
(5)  An owner of taxable transitory personal property, except motor vehicles
with a gross laden weight of 27,000 pounds or less, who has paid taxes on the
personal property and who removes the property from the state prior to
December, is entitled to a rebate of a proportionate share of the taxes paid
as determined by the commission.  If a claim for rebate or adjustments is
filed with the county auditor by December 10, the auditor shall immediately
submit the claim with a recommendation to the county executive for its
approval or denial.  If the claim is not approved prior to the end of the
calendar year, or within 30 days after its submission, or if the claim is
submitted after December 10, it shall be considered denied, and the owners of
the property may file an action in the district court for a refund or an
adjustment.
